Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1102
Promoting gambling, first degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of promoting gambling in the first degree if he or she knowingly advances or profits from unlawful gambling activity by:

(a) Engaging in bookmaking to the extent that he or she receives or accepts in any one day one or more bets totaling one thousand five hundred dollars or more; or

(b) Receiving, in connection with any unlawful gambling scheme or enterprise, one thousand five hundred dollars or more of money played in the scheme or enterprise in any one day.

(2) Promoting gambling in the first degree is, for the first offense, a Class I misdemeanor, for the second offense, a Class IV felony, and for the third and all subsequent offenses, a Class III felony. No person shall be charged with a second or subsequent offense under this section unless the prior offense or offenses occurred after August 24, 1979.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 218;

Laws 1979, LB 152, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 50.